Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 2. Watercraft Titling Certificates.

§§ 29.1-712 through 29.1-733.1.
Repealed by Acts 2013, c. 787, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references.

For provisions of Virginia Uniform Certificate of Title for Watercraft Act, see Article 2.1 (§

29.1-733.2

et seq.).

Editor’s note.

Former §

29.1-712

, pertaining to definitions, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.1; 1984, c. 418; 1987, c. 488; 1997, c. 877; former § 29.1-713, pertaining to who must or may apply for certificate of title; authority of employees of department, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.2; 1983, cc. 210, 324; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-714, pertaining to form and contents of application, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.3; 1983, c. 75; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-715, pertaining to notice by owner of change of address, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.4; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-716, pertaining to certificate of title prerequisite to issuance of certificate of number, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.5; 1987, c. 488; 1997, c. 877; former § 29.1-717, pertaining to certificate of title required; certificate as evidence; duration; transfer of title, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.6; 1987, c. 488; 1995, c. 241; 1997, c. 877; former § 29.1-717.1, pertaining to transfer when certificate of title lost, etc., derived from 1989, c. 157; former § 29.1-717.2, pertaining to transfer by operation of law, derived from 1989, c. 157; former § 29.1-717.3, pertaining to transfer of title when no qualification on estate, derived from 1993, c. 675; former § 29.1-718, pertaining to department’s records; fees; exemption, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.7; 1983, c. 176; 1985, c. 68; 1987, c. 488; 1991, c. 82; former § 29.1-719, pertaining to acquisition of watercraft by dealer, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.8; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-720, pertaining to transfer to or from dealer; manufacturer’s or importer’s certificate, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.9; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-721, pertaining to dealer’s records, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.10; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-722, pertaining to duplicate certificate of title, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.11; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-723, pertaining to certificate to show security interests, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.12; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-724, pertaining to security interests subsequently created, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.13; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-725, pertaining to certificate as notice of security interest, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.14; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-726, pertaining to security interest may be filed within thirty days after purchase, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.15; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-727, pertaining to priority of security interests shown on certificates, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.16; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-728, pertaining to who to hold certificate of title subject to security interest, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.17; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-729, pertaining to release of security interests shown on certificate of title, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.18; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-730, pertaining to surrender of certificate required when security interest paid, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.19; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-731, pertaining to levy of execution, etc., derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.20; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-732, pertaining to possession of certificate of title issued to another unlawful, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.21; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-733, pertaining to registration prima facie evidence of ownership; rebuttal, derived from 1981, c. 405, § 62.1-186.23; 1987, c. 488; former § 29.1-733.1, pertaining to acquiring title to an abandoned vessel, derived from 1988, c. 25; 2005, c. 225; 2011, cc. 105, 151.